Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-138
Animals; cruelty, prevention of.

A city of the second class shall have the power by ordinance to prohibit and punish cruelty to animals.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5032;

C.S.1922, § 4201;

C.S.1929, § 17-140;

R.S.1943, § 17-138;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 30.